ko: 헬멧 차량 적합성: 어드벤처/듀얼 스포츠; 크루저; 오프로드/모토크로스; 스쿠터/모페드; 스포츠; 스트리트; 투어링; 트랙/레이싱; 기타
fr: Adéquation du casque au véhicule: Aventure/Double usage; Cruiser; Tout-terrain/Motocross; Scooter/Cyclomoteur; Sport; Route; Tourisme; Piste/Course; Autre
fi: Kypärän sopivuus ajoneuvoon: Adventure / Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road / Motocross; Skootteri/mopo; Sport; Katu; Touring; Rata/kilpa-ajo; Muu
nl: Helm voertuig pasvorm: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Offroad/motocross; Scooter/bromfiets; Sport; Straat; Touring; Circuit/racen; Overig
lt-LT: Šalmo transporto priemonės pritaikymas: Nuotykių / dvejopos paskirties; Kruizeris; Bekelė / motokrosas; Motoroleris / mopedas; Sportinis; Gatvės; Turistinis; Trekas / lenktynės; Kita
da: Kompatibilitet med køretøjstype for hjelm: Adventure/dual-sport; Cruiser; Offroad/motocross; Scooter/knallert; Sport; Street; Touring; Bane/racer; Andet
en: Helmet vehicle fit: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Scooter/Moped; Sport; Street; Touring; Track/Racing; Other
vi: Độ phù hợp của mũ bảo hiểm với xe: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Địa hình/Motocross; Xe tay ga/Moped; Thể thao; Đường phố; Touring; Đường đua/Đua xe; Khác
pt-PT: Ajuste do capacete ao veículo: Aventura/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Todo o terreno/Motocross; Scooter/Ciclomotor; Desporto; Estrada; Touring; Pista/Corrida; Outro
ja: ヘルメットの車両適合性: アドベンチャー/デュアルスポーツ; クルーザー; オフロード/モトクロス; スクーター/モペッド; スポーツ; ストリート; ツーリング; トラック/レーシング; その他
el: Κράνος κατάλληλο για όχημα: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Σκούτερ/Μοτοποδήλατο; Sport; Street; Touring; Πίστας/Αγωνιστικό; Άλλο
nb: Hjelmtilpasning for kjøretøy: Adventure/dual-sport; Cruiser; Offroad/motocross; Scooter/moped; Sport; Gate; Touring; Bane/racing; Annet
tr: Kask araç uyumluluğu: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road/Motokros; Scooter/Moped; Spor; Cadde; Touring; Pist/Yarış; Diğer
ru: Совместимость шлема с типом транспорта: Турэндуро / двойного назначения; Круизер; Внедорожный / мотокросс; Скутер / мопед; Спортивный; Городской; Туристический; Трековый / гоночный; Другое
de: Vorgesehene Fahrzeugart des Helms: Adventure/Dual-Sport; Cruiser; Off-Road/Motocross; Roller/Moped; Sport; Straße; Touring; Rennstrecke/Racing; Andere
sl-SI: Prileganje čelade v vozilu: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Terensko/motokros; Skuter/moped; Športno; Cestno; Touring; Dirkališče/dirkalno; Drugo
it: Adatto per casco da veicolo: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Fuoristrada/Motocross; Scooter/Ciclomotore; Sport; Strada; Touring; Pista/Racing; Altro
zh-CN: 头盔适配车型: 探险/双用途; 巡航; 越野/场地越野; 踏板车/轻便摩托车; 运动; 街车; 旅行; 赛道/竞速; 其他
ro-RO: Potrivirea căștii în vehicul: Aventură/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Scuter/Moped; Sport; Stradă; Touring; Pistă/Curse; Altele
hu: Sisak járműre való alkalmassága: Kaland/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Robogó/Moped; Sport; Utcai; Túra; Pálya/Verseny; Egyéb
zh-TW: 頭盔適用車輛: 冒險/多功能; 巡航車; 越野車/技術車; 速克達/輕型機車; 仿賽車/運動型; 街車; 休旅車; 賽道/競賽; 其他
pt-BR: Ajuste do capacete ao veículo: Aventura/Uso misto; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Scooter/Ciclomotor; Esportiva; Street; Touring; Pista/Corrida; Outros
es: Compatibilidad del casco con el vehículo: Aventura/doble propósito; Crucero; Todoterreno/motocross; Scooter/ciclomotor; Deportiva; Calle; Turismo; Pista/carreras; Otro
sv: Fordonspassning för hjälm: Äventyr/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Offroad/Motocross; Scooter/Moped; Sport; Street; Touring; Bana/Racing; Annat
hr-HR: Prilagođavanje kacige vozilu: Adventure / Dual-sport; Cruiser; Terensko / Motocross; Skuter / moped; Sport; Cesta; Touring; Staza / utrke; Ostalo
sk-SK: Prispôsobenie prilby vozidlu: Adventure/Enduro; Cruiser; Terén/Motokros; Skúter/Moped; Šport; Cesta; Cestovné; Trať/Preteky; Iné
pl: Dopasowanie kasku do pojazdu: Adventure / dual sport; Cruiser; Off-road / motocross; Skuter / motorower; Sportowe; Szosowe; Turystyczne; Torowe / wyścigowe; Inne
th: หมวกกันน็อคพอดีกับรถ: แอดเวนเจอร์/ดูอัลสปอร์ต; ครุยเซอร์; ออฟโรด/โมโตครอส; สกู๊ตเตอร์/โมเปด; สปอร์ต; สตรีท; ทัวร์ริ่ง; สนามแข่ง/เรซซิ่ง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Съвместимост на каската с превозно средство: Адвенчър/Дуал спорт; Круизър; Офроуд/Мотокрос; Скутер/Мотопед; Спортен; Уличен; Туристически; Пистов/Състезателен; Други
cs: Přilba vhodná pro vozidla: Adventure/Enduro; Cruiser; Off-road/Motocross; Skútr/Moped; Sport; Silniční; Touring; Okruhy/závodní; Jiné